New York, session 2025-2026, S2124.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 26 of section 210-B of the tax law is amended 2 by adding two new paragraphs (g) and (h) to read as follows: 3 (g) (i) The allocation of the credit established by this subdivision 4 may be made without regard to and in a separate manner from any federal 5 rehabilitation credit that may be allocated with respect to a certified 6 historic structure under section forty-seven of the internal revenue 7 code by written agreement of the taxpayer otherwise entitled to claim 8 such credit or by written agreement of a pass-through entity that may 9 report such credit or otherwise elect to pass the federal rehabilitation 10 tax credit through to a tenant taxpayer in accordance with applicable 11 federal law. 12 (ii) With respect to certified historic structures that are subject to 13 a lease arrangement whereby the landlord elects to pass the federal 14 rehabilitation credit through to the tenant taxpayer, not only may the 15 New York state rehabilitation credit be passed down to the tenant 16 taxpayer and then allocated without regard to and in a separate manner 17 from any federal rehabilitation credit that may be allocated, but the 18 landlord may also opt to retain the New York state rehabilitation cred- 19 it. For purposes of this section, a "landlord" means the owner of the 20 certified historic structure for federal tax purposes. 21 (iii) The New York state rehabilitation credit may be transferred as 22 provided for in article fourteen-A of the parks, recreation and historic 23 preservation law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05760-01-5 S. 2124 2 1 (h) The commissioner shall report annually, on or before the first day 2 of November, on the aggregate amount of credits claimed pursuant to this 3 subdivision on returns filed during the preceding calendar year. Such 4 report shall be provided to the governor, temporary president of the 5 senate, speaker of the assembly, chairs of the senate committees on 6 finance and on housing, construction and community development, and 7 chairs of the assembly committees on ways and means and on housing and 8 shall be made publicly available on the department's website. 9 § 2. Subsection (oo) of section 606 of the tax law is amended by 10 adding two new paragraphs 7 and 8 to read as follows: 11 (7) (A) The allocation of the credit established by this subsection 12 may be made without regard to and in a separate manner from any federal 13 rehabilitation credit that may be allocated with respect to a certified 14 historic structure under section forty-seven of the internal revenue 15 code by written agreement of the taxpayer otherwise entitled to claim 16 such credit or by written agreement of a pass-through entity that may 17 report such credit or otherwise elect to pass the federal rehabilitation 18 tax credit through to a tenant taxpayer in accordance with applicable 19 federal law. 20 (B) With respect to certified historic structures that are subject to 21 a lease arrangement whereby the landlord elects to pass the federal 22 rehabilitation credit through to the tenant taxpayer, not only may the 23 New York state rehabilitation credit be passed down to the tenant 24 taxpayer and then allocated without regard to and in a separate manner 25 from any federal rehabilitation credit that may be allocated, but the 26 landlord may also opt to retain the New York state rehabilitation cred- 27 it. For purposes of this section, a "landlord" means the owner of the 28 certified historic structure for federal tax purposes. 29 (C) The New York state rehabilitation credit may be transferred as 30 provided for in article fourteen-A of the parks, recreation and historic 31 preservation law. 32 (8) The commissioner shall report annually, on or before the first day 33 of November, on the aggregate amount of credits claimed pursuant to this 34 subsection on returns filed during the preceding calendar year. Such 35 report shall be provided to the governor, temporary president of the 36 senate, speaker of the assembly, chairs of the senate committees on 37 finance and on housing, construction and community development, and 38 chairs of the assembly committees on ways and means and on housing and 39 shall be made publicly available on the department's website. 40 § 3. Subdivision (y) of section 1511 of the tax law, as added by chap- 41 ter 472 of the laws of 2010, is amended by adding two new paragraphs 7 42 and 8 to read as follows: 43 (7) (A) The allocation of the credit established by this subdivision 44 may be made without regard to and in a separate manner from any federal 45 rehabilitation credit that may be allocated with respect to a certified 46 historic structure under section forty-seven of the internal revenue 47 code by written agreement of the taxpayer otherwise entitled to claim 48 such credit or by written agreement of a pass-through entity that may 49 report such credit or otherwise elect to pass the federal rehabilitation 50 tax credit through to a tenant taxpayer in accordance with applicable 51 federal law. 52 (B) With respect to certified historic structures that are subject to 53 a lease arrangement whereby the landlord elects to pass the federal 54 rehabilitation credit through to the tenant taxpayer, not only may the 55 New York state rehabilitation credit be passed down to the tenant 56 taxpayer and then allocated without regard to and in a separate manner S. 2124 3 1 from any federal rehabilitation credit that may be allocated, but the 2 landlord may also opt to retain the New York state rehabilitation cred- 3 it. For purposes of this section, a "landlord" means the owner of the 4 certified historic structure for federal tax purposes. 5 (C) The New York state rehabilitation credit may be transferred as 6 provided for in article fourteen-A of the parks, recreation and historic 7 preservation law. 8 (8) The commissioner shall report annually, on or before the first day 9 of November, on the aggregate amount of credits claimed pursuant to 10 this subdivision on returns filed during the preceding calendar year. 11 Such report shall be provided to the governor, temporary president of 12 the senate, speaker of the assembly, chairs of the senate committees on 13 finance and on housing, construction and community development, and 14 chairs of the assembly committees on ways and means and on housing and 15 shall be made publicly available on the department's website. 16 § 4. The parks, recreation and historic preservation law is amended by 17 adding a new article 14-A to read as follows: 18 ARTICLE 14-A 19 HISTORIC REHABILITATION TAX CREDIT TRANSFER PROGRAM 20 Section 14.15 Definitions. 21 14.16 Transfer of rehabilitation credit. 22 14.17 Reporting. 23 14.18 Regulations, coordination with federal rehabilitation 24 credit provisions. 25 § 14.15 Definitions. As used in this article, the following terms 26 shall have the following meanings: 27 1. "Federal rehabilitation credit" means the federal credit that may 28 be allocated with respect to a certified historic structure under 29 section forty-seven of the internal revenue code. References in this 30 article to section forty-seven of the internal revenue code shall mean 31 such section as amended from time to time. 32 2. "Pass-through entity" means an entity that is not a taxpayer under 33 federal or state tax law, such as a limited liability company, a part- 34 nership, an S Corporation, or any other entity as determined by the 35 commissioner of taxation and finance which is deemed to be a reporting 36 entity for income tax purposes and files annual information returns 37 passing through items of income, loss, credits and certain other tax 38 attributes to each partner, member or shareholder as applicable. 39 3. "Qualified rehabilitation expenditures" shall have the same meaning 40 as in section forty-seven of the internal revenue code. 41 4. "Regulations" means regulations adopted by the commissioner, in 42 consultation with the commissioner of the department of taxation and 43 finance, pursuant to section 14.18 of this article. 44 5. "Rehabilitation credit" means the credit provided for under subdi- 45 vision twenty-six of section two hundred ten-B, subsection (oo) of 46 section six hundred six or subdivision (y) of section fifteen hundred 47 eleven of the tax law. 48 6. "Transferee" means a taxpayer or a pass-through entity that 49 receives a transfer of the rehabilitation credit. A transferee need not 50 own an interest in the certified historic structure or in an entity with 51 an ownership interest in the certified historic structure to receive a 52 transfer of a rehabilitation credit. 53 7. "Non-profit transferee" means a non-profit entity that receives a 54 transfer of the rehabilitation credit. 55 § 14.16 Transfer of rehabilitation credit. Either a 1. taxpayer or 56 pass-through entity that may report the rehabilitation credit or other- S. 2124 4 1 wise elect to pass the federal rehabilitation credit through to a tenant 2 taxpayer in accordance with applicable federal law or 2. non-profit 3 transferee may, with prior notice in accordance with the regulations, 4 transfer the rehabilitation credit, in whole or in part, to any trans- 5 feree or non-profit transferee with the same effect as if the transferee 6 or non-profit transferee had incurred the qualified rehabilitation 7 expenditures itself; provided that no partial transfer of the rehabili- 8 tation credit may be for less than twenty-five percent of the full reha- 9 bilitation credit claimed by the taxpayer. A transferee shall use or 10 report the rehabilitation credit in the year it is allowed and may not 11 transfer the rehabilitation credit on to yet another transferee. A 12 transfer of rehabilitation credit to a non-profit transferee, where the 13 non-profit transferee is solely acting as a go-between to further trans- 14 fer the rehabilitation credit to a transferee, shall not constitute a 15 transfer for purposes of determining the single transfer limitation of 16 this section. 17 § 14.17 Reporting. If a taxpayer or a pass-through entity that may 18 report the credit or otherwise elect to pass the federal rehabilitation 19 credit through to a tenant taxpayer in accordance with applicable feder- 20 al law elects to transfer the credit as provided for in section 14.16 of 21 this article, prior to filing any tax returns claiming the rehabili- 22 tation credit, a taxpayer or a pass-through entity that may report the 23 rehabilitation credit or otherwise elect to pass the federal rehabili- 24 tation credit through to a tenant taxpayer in accordance with applicable 25 federal law shall provide an information statement to the commissioner 26 in accordance with the department's regulations. Such information state- 27 ment shall include, but may not be limited to, the identity and tax 28 identification information of any non-profit transferee and the identity 29 and tax identification information of any transferee that will claim the 30 credit. 31 § 14.18 Regulations, coordination with federal rehabilitation credit 32 provisions. The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of 33 the department of taxation and finance, shall promulgate rules and regu- 34 lations necessary to administer the provisions of this article. 35 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 36 years beginning on and after January 1, 2026.